Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2003
Compliance review documents; confidentiality, exception; use in evidence.

Except as provided in section 8-2004:

(1) Compliance review documents are confidential and are not discoverable or admissible in evidence in any civil action arising out of matters evaluated by the compliance review committee. Compliance review committee members shall treat compliance review documents and all proceedings of the compliance review committee as confidential and shall not be compelled to testify regarding such confidential documents or proceedings in any civil action arising out of matters evaluated by the compliance review committee, except that information, documents, or records otherwise available from original sources are not to be construed as immune from discovery or admissibility in any civil action merely because such information, documents, or records were evaluated by the compliance review committee; and

(2) Compliance review documents delivered to a federal or state governmental agency are to remain confidential and are not discoverable or admissible in evidence in any civil action arising out of matters evaluated by the compliance review committee.

Laws 1995, LB 626, § 3.